Utah statutes.
77-17-2.   Discharging one of several defendants -- To testify for state.

When two or more persons are included in the same charge, the court may at any time, on the application of the prosecuting attorney, direct any defendant to be discharged or his case severed so that he may be a witness for the prosecution.

